Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,105
Distribution in kind; evidence.

If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative shall execute an instrument or deed of distribution assigning, transferring, or releasing the assets to the distributee as evidence of the distributee's title to the property. If the distribution is of real property, the deed of distribution shall be recorded with the register of deeds in each county in which such real property is situated and shall indicate the court in which probate proceedings were conducted.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 183, UPC § 3-907;

Laws 1984, LB 405, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 105, § 1.